Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-301
Insurance companies; corporation laws
apply; exceptions.

The Nebraska
Model Business Corporation Act, except as otherwise provided in
Chapter 44, shall apply to all domestic incorporated insurance companies so
far as the act is applicable or pertinent to and not in conflict with other
provisions of the law relating to such companies. An assessment association
that has accumulated and continues to maintain (1) reserves and (2) surplus
or contingency funds at least equal to those required of a mutual insurance
company shall, unless otherwise provided by law, be deemed to have all the
powers and privileges in transacting its business and managing its affairs
as those possessed by a mutual insurance company qualified to transact the
same line or lines of insurance as the assessment association.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 30, p. 412;

R.S.1913, § 3166;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. IV, § 1, p. 590;

C.S.1922, § 7766;

C.S.1929, § 44-301;

R.S.1943, § 44-301;

Laws 1955, c. 172, § 1, p. 488;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 92;

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 220;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 286.

Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, see section 21-201.